West Virginia, session 2026, HB4835.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. TRAFFIC SIGNS, SIGNALS AND MARKINGS. §17C-3-2. Placing and maintaining traffic-control devices and signs on state highways. (a) The state road commission shall place and maintain such traffic-control devices, conforming to its manual and specifications, upon all state highways as it shall deem necessary to indicate and to carry out the provisions of this chapter or to regulate, warn, or guide traffic: Provided, That notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, the commission shall reprogram all traffic-control lights and devices to add a three-second pause from the time one set of lights turns red and the opposite set of lights turns green on divided highways.(b) No local authority shall place or maintain any traffic- control device upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the state road commission except by the latter's permission.